Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.721

Proceeds and expenses.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited partnership and not to the derivative plaintiff;

(b) If the derivative plaintiff receives any proceeds, the derivative plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the limited partnership.

(2) If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, from the recovery of the limited partnership.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1005.]